Louisiana, session 2026, SB331.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:1855(Q) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1855. Exceptions
* * *
Q. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary,
beginning August 1, 2026, through August 1, 2031, no provision of this Part
shall:
(1) Prohibit the channelization, clearing and snagging, channel
realignment, or dredging operations for drainage purposes in the West Pearl
River and its tributaries from Lock 1 to the Rigolets.
(2) Require a permit pursuant to R.S. 56:1849 for the channelization,
clearing and snagging, channel realignment, or dredging operations for
drainage purposes in the West Pearl River and its tributaries from Lock 1 to the
Rigolets.
(3) Allow for any new commercial development or clustered residential
development along a designated scenic river during the period and at the
location authorized by this Subsection.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.